Washington statutes.
RCW 36.160.100

Public school cultural access program.

A program created under this chapter must develop and provide a public school cultural access program, as provided in RCW 36.160.110.

[ 2020 c 192 s 2; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 24 s 502.]

NOTES:

Construction—2015 3rd sp.s. c 24: See note following RCW 36.160.030.